Illinois, session 104th, HB3062.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Universities Civil Service Act is 5amended by changing Section 36f as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 70/36f)  (from Ch. 24 1/2, par. 38b5)7    Sec. 36f. Examinations. 8    (a) All examinations given under the University System 9shall be open to all applicants who are citizens of or 10residents in the State of Illinois and who can qualify by 11training and experience for the position for which application 12is made. Preference shall be given to applicants who are 13citizens of or residents in this State; however, if, after 6 14months, no qualified State residents have filled the position, 15the position may be filled by any qualified candidate without 16requiring an additional posting on behalf of the university or 17other State entity. If a qualified candidate is chosen who is 18not a State resident, that candidate shall have 12 months to 19establish residency within this State or within 60 miles of 20the facility located within this State at which the candidate 21will be employed. In examinations for technical positions for 22which no qualified residents of this State are available the 23residence requirement may be waived. In examinations for law   HB3062 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 09663 LNS 19729 b1enforcement personnel, the residence requirement shall be 2waived. 3    (b) Examinations may be written; oral; by statement of 4training and experience; in the form of tests of knowledge, 5skill, capacity, intellect, or aptitude; or by any other 6method which, in the judgment of the Merit Board, is 7reasonable and practical for any particular classification. 8The examinations shall be practical and shall relate to the 9classification for which the examination is given. No question 10in any examination shall relate to political or religious 11affiliation or racial origins of the examinee.12    (c) Different examining procedures may be determined for 13the examinations in different classifications, but all 14examinations in the same classification must be uniform. The 15examination requirement for the initial appointment, entry 16level position only, of law enforcement personnel may be 17waived if an applicant has satisfied all the requirements 18established by the Illinois Police Training Act for 19appointment of law enforcement officers and if the Merit Board 20allows for such a waiver by rule. Additional positions, entry 21level only, may have the examination requirement waived if the 22occupational standards are regulated by the Department of 23Financial and Professional Regulation, as designated by the 24Merit Board and provided for in adopted rules. 25(Source: P.A. 103-287, eff. 1-1-24.)